Hawaii statutes.
§832-19 Persons under criminal prosecution
in this State at time of requisition. If a criminal prosecution has been
instituted against such person under the laws of this State and is still
pending, the governor, in the governor's discretion, either may surrender the
person on demand of the executive authority of any state or hold the person
until the person has been tried and discharged or convicted and punished in
this State. [L 1941, c 99, §19; RL 1945, §10649; RL 1955, §250-19; HRS §713-19;
ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next